DIAGNOSTICS -

ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI-319

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:

When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.

HINT:

e Using SST 09843 -18020, connect the terminals Tc and E , and remove the short pin.

. If any abnormality is not found when inspecting parts, inspect the ECU.

. If a malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code. For de-
tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the

DI28U-06

DTC chart.
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
co0278/ 11 N . .
Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
(D1-335) « ABS selenaidrelac)
C0279/ 12 s * ABS solenoid relay circuit
B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
(DI-335) y
C0226/2 1 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-333) (SFRcircuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-333) (SFLcircuit) e SFLRor SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-333) (SRRcircuit) * SRHor SRR circuit
C1225/25 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-333) (SA1 circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-333) (SA2circuit) ¢ SA2circuit
1
020078 1* Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
i wi i uncti
(DI-325) 9 P g
1
C0205/32* . .
(DI-325) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction « Right front, leftfront, right rear and left rear speed sensor
T * Each speed'sensorcircuit -
C0210/33* . . .
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Sensorrotor
(DI-325)
1
C0215/34" Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
wi i uncti
(DI-325) P g
C1237/37 S tire is diff t size fi the other ti Tiresi
ome tire is different size from the other tires * Tiresize
(DI1-338)
* Batt
C1241 / 41 L L attery
(DI-339) Low battery voltage or opencircuitin IG 1 circuit *|Cregulator
* Powersource circuit
* Batt
C1242/42 O ircuit in 1G2 circuit ICa ery| t
en circuit in circui «|Cregulator
(DI-343) P 9 o
* Power source circuit
C1243/43 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) ) .
(D1-347) * Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1244/44 o . o ¢ Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit ) -
(D1-349) * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/45 Malfunction in deceleration sensor " Deceleration sensor
unction i i
(DI1-347) * Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1248/48 * Openorshortcircuitin rear differential lock circuit . .
. L . * Rear differential lock
(DI-351) « Rear differential is locking
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SUPPLY SYSTEM
C1249/49 o ) . L . . L
Open circuit in stop light switch circuit « Stop light switch circuit
(D1-354)
2
C1251/51* ¢ Pump motorislocked Hvdraulic brake boost ‘
. raulic brake booster pump motor
(DI-359) ¢ Opencircuitin pump motor ground y pump
C1252/52¢ 2 » Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
(DI-364) Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PHor PL)
4
C1253/53" Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction »ABS motorrelay
i i
(DI-371) ydrad pump y ! * ABS motorrelay circuit
4
C1254/54* P itch functi  Pressure switch (PHor PL)
r r malfunction
(DI-377) essure swiich mafiunctio * Pressure switch circuit
C1256/56* 2 . °Accumulator.
(DI-381) Accumulator low pressure malfunction * Pressure switch (PHor PL)
» Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
2 *Batt
C1257/57* . . . 2 e P
(DI-388) Power supply drive circuit malfunction * Power Source circuit
*ABSECU
* Battery
Always ON *|Cregulator
Malfunction in ABS ECU
(DI-392) affunction in e Power source circuit
*ABSECU

*: Asthe DTC cannot be erased by replacing parts alone do either of the following operations.
(1) Clear DTC (See page DI-312).
(2) Atthe vehicle speed of 20 km/h ( 12mph), drive the vehicle for 30 secs. ormore.
* 1 Using the following table, troubled parts can be specified.

DTC 42 51 52 53 54 56 57
BRAKE Warning ||ght andbuzzer Light Buzzer LightBuzzer| LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer ighBuzzer|
O O O 0 O
Pressure switch PH
PL 0 O 0 0 0
Pump motor e 0|0
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness
MT+ wire harness D
MT- wire harness 0
Accumulator malfunction O|D
MR1 open circuit 0
L MR2 open circuit .
Motor relay circuit 0l o 0
MR1 welded contact
MR2 welded contact Y -
Hydraulicbrake booster| Pressureleaks o |0 oo
Power souce* |G2 open circuit .
ECU Power supply circuit

**WhenIG 1 circuitis open, ABS warning lightand BRAKE warning light come on.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)




